Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.495

Written model policy—Duty to intervene.

(1) By December 1, 2021, the Washington state criminal justice training commission, in consultation with the Washington state patrol, the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and organizations representing state and local law enforcement officers, shall develop a written model policy on the duty to intervene, consistent with the provisions of RCW 10.93.190.

(2) By June 1, 2022, every state, county, and municipal law enforcement agency shall adopt and implement a written duty to intervene policy. The policy adopted may be the model policy developed under subsection (1) of this section. However, any policy adopted must, at a minimum, be consistent with the provisions of RCW 10.93.190.

(3) By January 31, 2022, the commission shall incorporate training on the duty to intervene in the basic law enforcement training curriculum. Peace officers who completed basic law enforcement training prior to January 31, 2022, must receive training on the duty to intervene by December 31, 2023.

[ 2021 c 321 s 2.]